Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-102
Volunteer fire department; number of members; apparatus.

No volunteer fire department shall have upon its rolls at one time more than twenty-five persons, for each engine and hose company in such fire department, and no hook and ladder company shall have upon its rolls at any one time more than twenty-five members. No organization shall be deemed to be a bona fide fire or hook and ladder company until it has procured for active service apparatus for the extinguishment or prevention of fires, in case of a hose company, to the value of seven hundred dollars, and of a hook and ladder company to the value of five hundred dollars.

Laws 1867 (Ter.), § 2, p. 16;

G.S.1873, c. 24, § 2, p. 390;

R.S.1913, § 2497;

Laws 1915, c. 44, § 1, p. 122;

C.S.1922, § 2435;

C.S.1929, § 35-102;

R.S.1943, § 35-102;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 74.